Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 2

Nonprofit Organizations for Support and Enhancement of State Parks

11-3-201. Legislative findings and intent.

The general assembly finds that in order to maintain and enhance the purposes, programs and functions of the state park system, including, but not limited to, educational, interpretative and recreational functions, nonprofit citizen support organizations may be organized, and the commissioner of environment and conservation, after approval of the commissioner of finance and administration, may enter into agreements with such organizations for the purpose of providing support, financial and otherwise, to a specific park or parks, or the state park system. The agreement shall be forwarded to the comptroller of the treasury for review and comment prior to the execution by any state official. It is the intent of this legislation that any revenues generated by these organizations be used to enhance the state parks and their programs. To that end, it is the intent that state appropriations to the parks not be reduced when revenues are generated by these organizations.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 1; 1994, ch. 753, §§ 1, 2.

11-3-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Citizen support organization” means an organization which:

Is organized as a nonprofit corporation, or is otherwise qualified to do business in Tennessee as a nonprofit corporation, pursuant to title 48, chapter 51;

Is exempt from payment of federal income taxes pursuant to § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as it may be amended;

Is incorporated for purposes which are consistent with the goals, objectives, programs, responsibilities and functions of the state park system as provided in title 11, as determined by the commissioner; and

Provides equal opportunities and membership to all persons regardless of race, color, national origin, sex, religion, age, disability or other constitutionally protected classification;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation or the duly authorized representative or, in the event of the commissioner's or representative's absence or vacancy in the office of commissioner, the deputy commissioner;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation; and

“Park” means an area as defined at § 11-3-101, and includes, but is not limited to, state natural areas, archaeological areas, historic areas, parks, scenic rivers, scenic trails and state forests.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 2; 2011, ch. 47, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

11-3-203. Agreements.

The commissioner may enter into an agreement with a citizen support organization for purposes consistent with this part if the commissioner determines it is in the best interest of a specific park or the park system generally.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 3.

11-3-204. Activities.

A citizen support organization which enters into an agreement with the commissioner may provide support, assistance or cooperation to a specific park or to the park system in general, including, but not limited to:

The provision of educational or interpretative material for sale;

The provision of exhibits and materials for display and related equipment and material;

The provision of financial support, whether through donation, gift or otherwise, for park programs, property or other park purposes;

The provision of volunteer personnel services or monetary contributions for adding state positions for park services;

The provision of equipment or other goods; and

The gift or donation of money to fund programs and exhibits or to procure equipment, materials, books or services.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 4.

11-3-205. Use of state park property and facilities.

If the commissioner enters into an agreement with a citizen support organization, the commissioner may authorize such organization to use, under such conditions as the commissioner may prescribe, property or facilities of the state park system to carry out its support activities.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 5.

11-3-206. Assistance by the commissioner.

The commissioner, through the director of the division of state parks, may assist organizers of a citizen support organization with its creation and may provide technical assistance to the organization after its incorporation. However, it is the responsibility of the citizen support organization to ensure that the organization is lawfully incorporated and operating.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 6.

11-3-207. Audits — Books and records.

All annual reports and all books of accounts and financial records of a citizen support organization shall be subject to audit annually by the comptroller of the treasury. With prior approval of the comptroller of the treasury, the audit may be performed by a licensed independent public accountant selected by the citizen support organization. If an independent public accountant is employed, the audit contract between the citizen support organization and the independent public accountant shall be on contract forms prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. The cost of any audit shall be paid by the citizen support organization; provided, that in the case of any audit performed by the comptroller of the treasury of any citizen support organization having gross receipts of less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for the fiscal period under audit, the cost of such audit shall be paid by the state.

The comptroller of the treasury shall ensure that audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and determine if the audits meet minimum audit standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. No audit may be accepted as meeting the requirements of this section until approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

One (1) copy of each audit shall be furnished to each member of the board of the citizen support organization, the department and the comptroller of the treasury.

The department and the comptroller of the treasury, or their designated representative, shall have access to the citizen support organization's books, records and accounts whenever deemed necessary by either office.

If the comptroller of the treasury determines that due to size or insignificant financial activities by a citizen support organization the requirement of this section for an audit is unnecessary or would be burdensome on a citizen support organization, then the comptroller of the treasury may waive the required audit.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 7; 1994, ch. 753, § 3.

11-3-208. Gifts and donations.

Any monetary gifts, donations or otherwise received by the department, the commissioner, the division of state parks or by a specific park from a citizen support organization and designated by the citizen support organization for the benefit of a specific park or the park system in general, shall be deposited directly to the account for the specific park or to the general account for the division of state parks, shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year and shall be retained in the account until expended, notwithstanding title 9, chapter 4, or such other provisions requiring all funds be deposited into or revert to the general fund.

Any gifts of equipment, materials, or other personal property to a specific park shall be used solely at that park unless the commissioner determines its use at another park is necessary.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 8.

11-3-209. Dissolution.

In the event a citizens support organization dissolves, any funds remaining after dissolution shall be donated to the division of state parks and shall be deposited, as provided in § 11-3-208, and applied for the provision or expansion of state park programs, services or facilities.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 9.

11-3-210. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, which the commissioner deems necessary to administer this part.

Acts 1993, ch. 40, § 10.